California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) State funds shall not be appropriated for purposes of implementing this section. The department is not required to undertake any new task pursuant to this section unless it receives federal or private funds for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Program for Injury Prevention in the Home Environment [9675. - 9681.]

9675.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Program for Injury Prevention in the Home Environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9676.

The Program for Injury Prevention in the Home Environment is hereby established. The department, through the Senior Housing and Information Support Center in the department, shall provide grants to eligible local level entities for injury prevention information and education programs and services pursuant to this article for the purpose of increasing the awareness and prevention of injuries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9677.

The department may provide a program grant to an eligible local public agency or nonprofit organization for the services specified in Section 9678 and for the following services:

(a) Provision of information and education regarding injury prevention to older adults and persons with disabilities living in the community.

(b) Comprehensive assessment of individual injury prevention needs.

(c) Consultation and instruction in the behavioral, physical, and environmental aspects of injury prevention.

(d) Mitigation of behavioral and physical factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 42.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9678.

(a) The Program for Injury Prevention in the Home Environment shall include funding for injury prevention needs, including injury prevention equipment and activities as well as material and labor costs, for homeowners and renters meeting income requirements established pursuant to subdivision (d). A local level entity selected to participate in the program shall comply with all of the requirements of this section in implementing the program.

(b) Equipment and activities covered under the program shall include all of the following:

(1) Grab bars, nonskid surfaces, shower seats, and transfer benches.

(2) Indoor and outdoor handrails.

(3) Reconfiguration of furniture and other elements of the physical home environment to reduce hazards.

(c) The payment for injury prevention equipment and services shall not exceed a seven-hundred-dollar ($700) maximum allowance per household.

(d) Eligibility for equipment and services, as described in this section, shall be limited to families, households, and individuals whose incomes do not exceed 80 percent of the county median income, with adjustments for family and household size.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9679.

(a) The department, in consultation with groups, including, but not limited to, the State and Local Injury Control section of the State Department of Health Services, and other groups knowledgeable and experienced in senior and disabled injury prevention, such as research-based university gerontology departments with extensive experience and work with the concept of aging in place and the benefits of home modification, a research center on gerontology, as well as local public health agencies, shall develop training and assessment tools necessary for carrying out this article.

(b) The department shall establish service standards that ensure that members of the population needing services under this article are identified and that the services provided assist them in living safely in their homes and apartments. The department shall award grants based upon compliance with these standards. The standards shall include, but not be limited to, a service planning process that is target-population based and includes both of the following:

(1) A determination of the number of clients to be served and the programs and services that will be provided to meet the injury prevention needs of those clients.

(2) Plans for services including outreach, design of injury prevention services, coordination, and access to education and assessment services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9680.

(a) The director shall establish a methodology for awarding grants under this article, in consultation with groups described in subdivision (a) of Section 9679. The director shall consult with these groups to develop criteria for the award of grants and the identification of specific performance measures.

(b) The criteria to be considered in the award of grants shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The description of a plan for providing outreach, prevention, intervention, and evaluation in a cost appropriate manner.

(2) The ability of the local level entities to engage in collaborations with local entities for
 purposes of program coordination, including, but not limited to, public and private nonprofit agencies that are experienced in injury prevention services, home modification services, home safety services, and services for older adults and people with disabilities.

(3) The ability of local level entities to gather and utilize other resources to supplant funding provided by the department.

(4) Demonstrated proficiency in, and awareness of, relevant issues in working with older adults and people with disabilities, particularly in relation to home modification and injury prevention.

(5) The description of the local population to be served, the ability to administer an effective service program, and the degree to which local agencies and advocates will support and collaborate with program efforts.

(6) The geographical representation of the applicants.

(7) The provision of a local match in funds.

(c) The funding provided pursuant to this article shall be sufficient to provide injury prevention education and assessment services and equipment and activities necessary for injury prevention in the home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 43.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9681.

(a) Funding of projects pursuant to this article shall be subject to the appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the Budget Act or another statute.

(b) Appropriations made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be expended to fund grants to eligible local public agencies or nonprofit organizations in an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) each.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 233.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. State Ombudsman [9700. - 9745.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent and Definitions [9700. - 9701.]

9700.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that the department, pursuant to a grant from the federal government, has established a Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program.

(b) The Legislature declares that it is the public policy of this state to encourage community contact and involvement with older adult patients or residents of long-term care facilities or residential facilities through the use of volunteers and volunteer programs, and this chapter does not limit or constrict the continuation of relationships established between ombudspersons, the older adult patients or residents of long-term care facilities or residential facilities, and the operators of these facilities.

(c) The Legislature finds that in order to
 comply with the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001, et seq.), as amended, and to effectively assist residents, patients, and clients of long-term care facilities in the assertion of their civil and human rights, the structure, powers, and duties of the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program must be specifically defined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 44.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9701.

Unless the contrary is stated or clearly appears from the context, the following definitions shall govern the interpretation of this chapter:

(a) “Approved organization” means any public agency or other appropriate organization that has been designated by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman to hear, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf of patients or residents of long-term care facilities relating to matters that may affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of these patients or residents.

(b) “Long-term care facility” means any of the following:

(1) Any nursing or skilled nursing facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including distinct parts of facilities that are required to comply with licensure requirements for skilled nursing facilities.

(2) Any residential care facility for the elderly as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Office” means the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, including approved organizations.

(d) “Ombudsman coordinator” means the individual selected by the governing board or executive director of the approved organization to manage the day-to-day operation of the ombudsman program, including the implementation of
 federal and state requirements governing the office.

(e) “Resident” or “patient” means an individual living in a long-term care facility.

(f) “State Ombudsman” means the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 3.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [9710. - 9719.5.]

9710.

There is within the department an Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9710.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman has an extremely important role in protecting and advocating for the rights and health and safety of long-term care facility residents, and in providing leadership, direction, and support to local long-term care ombudsman programs.

(2) The position of State Ombudsman is extremely important to the successful coordination of ombudsman services at the local level.

(3) The position of State Ombudsman requires both an extensive background
 in social or health services programs, and an ability to manage and motivate individuals and groups.

(4) Remuneration for the position of State Ombudsman should be commensurate with the demands of the position.

(b) The Director of the California Department of Aging shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide widespread notification of the availability of the position of State Long-Term Care Ombudsman in order to reach the greatest number of qualified candidates and hire the most capable individual for the position.

(2) Within 10 days of the occurrence of a vacancy, publicly announce the vacancy and solicit candidates for the position.

(3) Within 30 days of the occurrence of a vacancy, convene a meeting with the advisory council established by the department pursuant to Section 9740, for the purpose of obtaining the advice, consultation, and recommendations of the council regarding the selection of a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 4.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9711.

(a) The office shall be under the direction of a chief executive officer who shall be known as the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. The State Ombudsman shall be appointed by the director and shall report directly to the director. He or she shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of his or her position, and shall receive the salary otherwise provided by law.

(b) Any vacancy occurring in the position of State Ombudsman shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. Whenever the State Ombudsman dies, resigns, becomes ineligible to serve for any reason, or is removed from office, the director shall appoint an acting State Ombudsman within 30 days, who shall serve until the appointment and qualification of the State Ombudsman’s successor, but in no event longer than four months from the occurrence of the vacancy. The acting State Ombudsman shall exercise during this period all the powers and duties of the State Ombudsman pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9712.

(a) The office shall be headed by an individual, to be known as the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, who shall meet the qualifications established by the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.) and be selected from among individuals with expertise and experience in the fields of long-term care and advocacy. Within the first year of appointment, the State Ombudsman shall complete the training described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9719, and a 10-hour internship performing ombudsman services in a long-term care facility.

(b) The State Ombudsman shall be located in Sacramento. Other staff
 employed by the office may be located elsewhere in the state.

(c) (1) The State Ombudsman shall possess at least a bachelor’s degree, and have a minimum of five years’ professional experience that shall include all of the following areas:

(A) Gerontology, long-term care, or other relevant social services or health services programs.

(B) The legal system and the legislative process.

(C) Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation, and negotiation.

(D) Organizational management and program administration.

(2) The professional experience described in paragraph (1) requires any reasonable combination of the fields described in
 subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of that paragraph for a total of five years, and does not require five years’ experience in each area. At the discretion of the director, a master’s or doctoral degree relevant to a field described in paragraph (1) may be substituted for one or two years, respectively, of professional experience. However, the applicant’s professional experience and field of study leading to the master’s or doctoral degree shall, nevertheless, include all of the fields described in paragraph (1).

(d) The State Ombudsman may not have been employed by any long-term care facility within the three-year period immediately preceding his or her appointment.

(e) Neither the State Ombudsman nor any member of his or her immediate family may have, or have had
 within the past three years, any pecuniary interest in long-term care facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 5.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9712.5.

The State Ombudsman shall, personally or through representatives of the office, do all of the following:

(a) (1) Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints that are made by, or on behalf of, residents of long-term care facilities that relate to actions, inactions, or decisions of providers or representatives of providers of long-term care services, public agencies, or health and social services agencies that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of residents, including the welfare and rights of residents with respect to the appointment and activities of conservators, guardians, and representative payees.

(2) The requirement described in paragraph (1) shall not preclude the
 referral of other individuals’ complaints and concerns that a representative becomes aware are occurring in the facility to the appropriate governmental agency.

(3) At the conclusion of any investigation of a complaint, the findings shall be reported to the complainant. If the office does not investigate a complaint, the complainant shall be notified in writing of the decision not to investigate and the reasons for the decision.

(b) Provide services to assist residents in the protection of their health, safety, welfare, and rights.

(c) Inform residents about the means of obtaining services delivered by the providers or agencies described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or services described in subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Provide
 residents with regular and timely access to the services provided by the office through quarterly facility visits to skilled nursing facilities and residential care facilities for the elderly and provide residents or other complainants with timely responses from representatives of the office to complaints.

(2) To the extent permitted under federal law, paragraph (1) shall be implemented only to the maximum extent possible within available resources.

(e) Represent the interests of the residents before governmental agencies and seek administrative, legal, and other remedies to protect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of the residents.

(f) Provide administrative and technical assistance to entities designated as local ombudsman programs, to assist the entities in participating in the program.

(g) Analyze, comment on, and monitor the development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and other governmental policies and actions that pertain to the health, safety, welfare, and rights of the residents, with respect to the adequacy of long-term care facilities and services in the state, without interference from the office of the Governor, any state agency, or other entity.

(h) Facilitate public comment on relevant laws, regulations, policies, and actions.

(i) Recommend changes to relevant laws, regulations, policies, or actions that the office determines to be appropriate.

(j) Provide information that the office determines to be necessary to public and private agencies, legislators, and other persons, regarding the
 problems and concerns of residents of long-term care facilities and recommendations relating to resolving these problems and concerns.

(k) Provide for training representatives of the office.

(l) Promote the development of citizen organizations to participate in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 23.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9713.

(a) Upon request of the office, the Attorney General shall represent the office or the department and the state in litigation concerning affairs of the office, unless the Attorney General represents another state agency, in which case the agency or the office shall employ other counsel.

(b) The State Ombudsman may employ technical experts and other employees that, in his or her judgment, are necessary for the conduct of the business of the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 7.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9714.

The office shall solicit and receive funds, gifts, and contributions to support the operations and programs of the office. The office shall not solicit or receive any funds, gifts, or contributions if the solicitation or receipt would jeopardize the independence and objectivity of the office. The office shall deposit funds received pursuant to this section into the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Improvement Act Account that is hereby created in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code. Revenues in this account shall, upon appropriation, be used for the purpose of supporting the operations and programs of the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9714.5.

(a) The office may form a foundation eligible to receive tax-deductible contributions to support the operations and programs of the office and the operations of the foundation. The foundation shall not solicit or receive any funds, gifts, or contributions if the solicitation or receipt would jeopardize the independence and objectivity of the office or foundation.

(b) The foundation formed pursuant to this section shall be under the direction and management of a five-member board of directors. One member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and three members shall be appointed by the Governor. The members
 of the board shall each be experienced in the management, promotion, and funding of nonprofit charitable organizations.

(c) The board shall select from among its members a chair, a vice chair, and any other officers as it deems necessary.

(d) The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties as directors.

(e) Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the board’s business.

(f) By March 1 of each year, the board shall determine the amount of funds to be allocated from the foundation to the office for the
 support of the operations and programs of the office and the operations of the foundation. Foundation funds may only be expended for the support of the operations and programs of the office and the operations of the foundation.

(g) The members of the board shall be free from conflicts of interest and shall be subject to the same conflict of interest provisions that apply to the State Ombudsman under Section 3058g(f)(3) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 521, Sec. 2.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9715.

(a) No representative of the office shall be held liable for good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(b) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action shall be taken against any employee of a facility or agency, any patient, resident, or client of a long-term care facility, or any volunteer, for any communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the office in carrying out its duties and responsibilities, unless the same was done maliciously or without good faith. This subdivision is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.

(c) All communications by a representative of the office, if reasonably related to the requirements of that individual’s responsibilities under this chapter and done in good faith, shall be privileged, and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or slander.

(d) Any representative of the office shall be exempt from being required to testify in court as to any confidential matters, except as the court may deem necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9716.

(a) The office shall be responsible for activities that promote the development, coordination, and utilization of resources to meet the long-term care needs of older individuals, consistent with its mission. These responsibilities shall include establishing a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relative to complaints and conditions in long-term care facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant problems. The office shall submit the data to the state agency responsible for licensing or certifying long-term care facilities and to the federal Administration on Aging.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of
 the Government Code, beginning September 30, 2013, and annually thereafter, the office shall prepare and submit an annual advocacy report in accordance with Section 3058g(h)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The annual advocacy report shall do all of the following:

(1) Describe the activities carried out by the office in the year for which the report is prepared, including, but not limited to, actions taken to carry out the advocacy duties of the office described in Sections 9712.5 and 9726.1 and prescribed by the federal Older Americans Act in Section 3058g(a)(3)(E) and (G) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Contain and analyze the data collected pursuant to Section 3058g(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) Evaluate the problems experienced by, and the complaints made by or on behalf of, residents.

(4) Contain recommendations for both of the following:

(A) Improving quality of the care and life of residents.

(B) Protecting the health, safety, welfare, and rights of residents.

(5) (A) Analyze the success of the ombudsman program, including success in providing services to residents of long-term care facilities and other similar adult care facilities.

(B) Identify barriers that prevent the optimal operation of the program.

(6) Provide policy, regulatory, and legislative recommendations to solve identified problems, to resolve complaints, to improve the quality of care and life of residents, to protect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of residents, and to remove the barriers identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5).

(c) The office shall promptly post the annual advocacy report on its Internet Web site and shall submit it to the Assistant Secretary of the federal Administration on Aging, the Governor, the Legislature, the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Social Services, local ombudsman programs, and other appropriate governmental entities.

(d) The State Ombudsman shall consult with the local ombudsman programs in developing the
 report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 10.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9716.11.

(a) The Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall maintain an Internet Web presence.

(b) The Internet Web site shall be easily found and prominent on the department’s homepage. The Legislature finds and declares that resources currently exist for this purpose.

(c) The Internet Web site shall be consumer driven and shall include, but not be limited to, current long-term care trends and issues, links to local ombudsman programs, the annual advocacy report described in Section 9716, and other information relevant to long-term care facility residents and
 consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 11.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9717.

(a) All advocacy programs and any programs similar in nature to the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program that receive funding or official designation from the state shall cooperate with the office, where appropriate. These programs include, but are not limited to, the Office of Human Rights within the State Department of State Hospitals, the Office of Patients’ Rights, Disability Rights California, and the Department of Rehabilitation’s Client Assistance Program.

(b) The office shall maintain a close working relationship with the Legal Services Development Program for the Elderly within the department.

(c) In order to ensure the provision of counsel for patients and residents of long-term care facilities,
 the office shall seek to establish effective coordination with programs that provide legal services for older adults, including, but not limited to, programs that are funded by the federal Legal Services Corporation or under the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), as amended.

(d) The department and other state departments and programs that have roles in funding, regulating, monitoring, or serving long-term care facility residents, including law enforcement agencies, shall cooperate with and meet with the office periodically and as needed to address concerns or questions involving the care, quality of life, safety, rights, health, and well-being of long-term care facility residents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 45.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9718.

Every long-term care facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 9701, shall post in a conspicuous location a notice of the name, address, and phone number of the office and the nearest approved organization, and a brief description of the services provided by the office and the approved organization. The form of the notice shall be approved by the office.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

9718.5.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a skilled nursing facility or residential care facility shall not, under any circumstances, deny entry to a representative of the office acting in their official capacity.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), nothing in this section is intended to affect the ability of the State Public Health Officer or a local health officer to limit contact with patients or staff at a skilled nursing facility or residents or staff at a residential care facility in order to prevent or limit the spread of a contagious,
 infectious, or communicable disease.

(b) During a state of emergency declared by the Governor, a health emergency declared by the State Public Health Officer, or a local health emergency declared by a local health officer, a skilled nursing facility or residential care facility may require the representative of the office entering the facility to adhere to infection control protocols for the duration of their visit that are no more stringent than those required for facility staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 583, Sec. 2.   (AB 1855)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9719.

(a) (1) The office shall sponsor a training of representatives of approved organizations at least twice each year. The office shall provide training to these representatives as appropriate. Prior to the certification of an ombudsperson by the office, individuals shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Have a criminal offender record clearance conducted by the State Department of Social Services. A clearance pursuant to Section 1569.17 of the Health and Safety Code shall constitute clearances for the purpose of entry to any long-term care facility.

(B) Have received a minimum of 36 hours of certification training that is approved by the office and offered by an approved
 organization, which shall include training on cultural competency and sensitivity in issues relating to the underserved older adult lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community.

(2) Upon receipt of an applicant’s criminal record clearance and acceptance by the office, the office shall issue a card identifying the bearer as a certified ombudsperson. Each ombudsperson shall receive a minimum of 12 hours of additional training annually.

(b) (1) The department shall contract with the State Department of Social Services to conduct a criminal offender record information search, pursuant to Section 1569.17 of the Health and Safety Code, for each applicant seeking certification as an ombudsperson. The State Department of Social Services shall notify the individual and the office of the individual’s clearance or denial.

(2) An applicant for certification as an ombudsperson shall not be responsible for any costs associated with transmitting the fingerprint images and related information or conducting criminal record clearances.

(c) This section does not prohibit the Department of Justice from assessing a fee pursuant to Section 11105 of the Penal Code to cover the cost of searching for or furnishing summary criminal offender record information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 46.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9719.5.

(a) (1) The department shall allocate all federal and state funds for local ombudsman programs according to the following distribution, but shall not allocate less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per fiscal year.

(2) After the base allocation, remaining funds shall be distributed in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Fifty percent of the funds shall be allocated to each local program based on the number of facilities served by the program in proportion to the total number of facilities in the state.

(2) Forty percent of the funds shall
 be allocated based on the number of beds within the local program’s area of service in proportion to the total number of beds in the state.

(3) Ten percent of the funds shall be allocated based on the total square miles within each local program’s area of service in proportion to the total number of square miles in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 9.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigation and Resolution of Complaints [9720.5. - 9726.1.]

9720.5.

The office shall give priority to investigations and complaint resolutions in 24-hour long-term care facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9721.

(a) The office may refer any complaint to any appropriate state or local government agency. The following state licensing authorities shall give priority to any complaint referred to them by the office, except that any complaint alleging an immediate threat to resident health and safety may be given first priority:

(1) Licensing and Certification Division of the State Department of Health Services.

(2) Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services.

(3) Board of Examiners for Nursing Home Administrators.

(4) Board of Registered Nurses.

(5) Medical Board of California.

(6) Board of Pharmacy.

(7) Board of Vocational Nurse and Psychiatric Technician Examiners.

(b) Any licensing authority that responds to a complaint against a long-term care facility that was referred to the authority by the office shall forward to the office copies of related inspection reports and plans of correction and notify the office of any citations and civil penalties levied against the long-term care facility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9722.

(a) Representatives of the office shall have the right to enter long-term care facilities and to unescorted, unhindered movement within them for the purposes of identifying, hearing, investigating, and resolving complaints, observing and monitoring conditions of residents and facilities, speaking confidentially with residents, and providing services to assist residents in protecting their health, safety, welfare, and rights. Entry shall be provided at any time deemed necessary and reasonable by the State Ombudsman to effectively carry out this chapter, for any of the purposes described in this subdivision.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be
 construed to restrict, limit, or increase any existing right of any organizations or individuals not described in subdivision (a) to enter, or provide assistance to patients or residents of, long-term care facilities.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall restrict any right or privilege of any patient or resident of a long-term care facility to receive visitors of his or her choice.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a long-term care facility, upon request by a representative of the office, shall provide a roster, census, or other list of the names and room numbers or room locations of all current residents or patients residing in the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 15.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9723.

The State Ombudsman shall have access to any record of a state or local government agency that is necessary to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter, including any record rendered confidential under Section 1094 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or Section 10850.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9724.

Notwithstanding Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code, in order for the office to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, the office shall have access to the medical or personal records of a patient or resident of a long-term care facility that are retained by the facility, under the following conditions:

(a) If the patient or resident has the ability to write, access may only be obtained by the written consent of the patient or resident.

(b) If the patient or resident is unable to write, oral consent may be given in the presence of a third party as witness.

(c) If the patient or resident is under a California guardianship or conservatorship of the person that provides the guardian or conservator with the authority to approve review of records, the office shall obtain the permission of the guardian or conservator for review of the records, unless any of the following apply:

(1) The existence of the guardianship or conservatorship is unknown to the office or the facility.

(2) The guardian or conservator cannot be reached within three working days.

(3) The office has reason to believe the guardian or conservator is not acting in the best interests of the ward or the conservatee.

(d) If the patient or resident is unable to express written or oral consent and there is no guardian, conservator, or legal representative, or the notification of the guardian, conservator, or legal representative is not applicable for reasons set forth in subdivision (c), inspection of records may be made by ombudsmen when there is sufficient cause for the inspection. The licensee may, at his or her discretion, permit other representatives of the office to inspect records in the performance of their official duties. Copies may be reproduced by the office. The licensee and facility personnel who disclose records pursuant to this subdivision shall not be liable for the disclosure. If investigation of records is sought pursuant to this subdivision, the ombudsman shall, upon request, produce a statement signed by the ombudsman coordinator authorizing the ombudsman to review the records.

(e) Facilities providing copies of records pursuant to this section may charge the actual copying cost for each page copied.

(f) Upon request by the office, a long-term care facility shall provide to the office, within 24 hours, the name, address, and telephone number of the conservator, legal representative, or next-of-kin of any patient or resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 16.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9725.
